District of Columbia statutes.
21-525

Hearing by court.

The court shall grant a hearing to a person whose continued hospitalization is ordered under section 21-524 , if he requests the hearing. The hearing shall be held within 24 hours after receipt of the request.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 754, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
This section is referenced in § 21-526 and § 24-531.07.
1981 Ed., § 21-525.
1973 Ed., § 21-525.
Law Review and Journal Commentaries Camouflaged Legitimacy: Civil Commitment, Property Rights, and Legal Isolation. Valerie L. Collins, 52 Howard Law Journal 407 (2009).